New York, session 2025-2026, A8379.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (e) of subdivision 6 of section 398-d of the 2 vehicle and traffic law, as amended by chapter 78 of the laws of 1998, 3 is amended to read as follows: 4 (e) [On and after March first, nineteen hundred ninety-nine, in] In no 5 case shall any inflatable restraint system be replaced with anything 6 other than a newly manufactured inflatable restraint system or [a 7 salvaged inflatable restraint system certified according to standards 8 established by a nationally recognized testing, engineering and research 9 body as provided for in subdivision two of] a recycled inflatable 10 restraint system in compliance with section four hundred fifteen-c of 11 this chapter. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "recycled inflat- 12 able restraint system" shall have the same meaning as such term is 13 defined in subdivision one of section four hundred fifteen-c of this 14 chapter. 15 § 2. Section 415-c of the vehicle and traffic law is REPEALED and a 16 new section 415-c is added to read as follows: 17 § 415-c. Sale of original equipment non-deployed recycled inflatable 18 restraint systems. 1. For purposes of this section the term "recycled 19 inflatable restraint system" shall mean an inflatable restraint system EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03688-08-6 A. 8379--A 2 1 which is non-deployed original equipment removed from a salvaged vehi- 2 cle. 3 2. A recycled inflatable restraint system shall not be installed in 4 another vehicle unless such recycled inflatable restraint system is a 5 correct replacement part for such other vehicle and is certified in 6 accordance with subdivision four of this section. No recycled inflata- 7 ble restraint system that is under an active manufacturer recall, comes 8 from a flood vehicle as indicated on an official salvage examination and 9 title application form prescribed by the commissioner, or that does not 10 have an identifiable serial number, shall be sold, offered for sale, or 11 installed in another vehicle. 12 3. A recycled inflatable restraint system shall only be sold or 13 offered for sale by a vehicle dismantler that is registered pursuant to 14 section four hundred fifteen-a of this article. Prior to selling or 15 offering for sale a recycled inflatable restraint system, such vehicle 16 dismantler shall: 17 (a) conduct an inspection of such system, which shall include, but not 18 be limited to: 19 (i) The vehicle identification number and the airbag trim color of the 20 vehicle from which the recycled inflatable restraint system was removed; 21 and 22 (ii) A visual inspection of the recycled inflatable restraint system, 23 and the module cover and electrical connectors of such recycled inflata- 24 ble restraint system, including review for any signs of damage or 25 contamination; and 26 (b) refer the vehicle identification number of the vehicle from which 27 the recycled inflatable restraint system was taken to a nationally 28 recognized theft index bureau approved by the commissioner, in consulta- 29 tion with the superintendent of financial services, to determine that 30 neither the recycled inflatable restraint system nor the motor vehicle 31 from which such system was removed were stolen, as determined at the 32 time of inquiry. 33 4. Upon the sale of a recycled inflatable restraint system, the vehi- 34 cle dismantler shall provide the buyer with a written certification of 35 the following information: 36 (a) the identity of the vehicle dismantler selling the recycled 37 inflatable restraint system; 38 (b) the vehicle identification number of the vehicle receiving the 39 recycled inflatable restraint system; 40 (c) the vehicle identification number of the vehicle from which the 41 recycled inflatable restraint system was removed; 42 (d) the vehicle dismantler's internal stock number for the recycled 43 inflatable restraint system; 44 (e) that the recycled inflatable restraint system is a correct 45 replacement part for the vehicle receiving such recycled inflatable 46 restraint system; 47 (f) that all of the requirements of the inspection as prescribed in 48 subdivision three of this section have been met; and 49 (g) that the vehicle identification number of the vehicle from which 50 the recycled inflatable restraint system was taken was referred to a 51 nationally recognized theft index bureau approved by the commissioner, 52 in consultation with the superintendent of financial services, for the 53 purposes of determining prior to sale or offering for sale that neither 54 the recycled inflatable restraint system nor the motor vehicle from 55 which such system was removed were stolen, as determined at the time of A. 8379--A 3 1 inquiry. The written certification shall state the date and the result 2 of the inquiry to such theft index bureau. 3 5. Each vehicle dismantler that sells or offers for sale recycled 4 inflatable restraint systems shall maintain an electronic log containing 5 all information required pursuant to subdivisions two, three and four of 6 this section. Such records shall be maintained in a manner and form 7 approved by the commissioner. Upon request of an agent of the commis- 8 sioner or of any police officer and during its regular and usual busi- 9 ness hours, the vehicle dismantler shall produce such records and permit 10 said agent or police officer to examine them. 11 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 12 it shall have become a law.